District of Columbia statutes.
31-402

Applicability.

This chapter shall apply to licensed insurers either domiciled in the District of Columbia or domiciled in a state that is not an accredited state having in effect a substantially similar law. All provisions of Chapter 7 of this title, to the extent they are not superseded by this chapter, shall continue to apply to all parties within holding company systems subject to this chapter.

Oct. 21, 1993, D.C. Law 10-52, § 3, 40 DCR 6129
1981 Ed., § 35-4002.